Massachusetts, session 194th, H4109.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of chapter 80 of the acts of 1929, as amended by section 1 of chapter 477 of the
acts of 1989, is hereby further amended by striking out the third paragraph and inserting in place
thereof the following paragraph:-
Beginning at point L in latitude sixteen thousand four hundred twenty-eight and sixteen
one hundredths feet north and longitude four thousand five hundred thirty-four and seven one
hundredths feet west, said point L being the most northerly point of the harbor line hereby
established on the westerly side of Acushnet river, being located north four degrees, twenty-one
minutes, fifty-five seconds east, true bearing, three hundred sixty-three and fifty-eight one
hundredths feet from Mark 10 on the Manomet mill property in the city of New Bedford; thence
south five degrees, twenty minutes, thirty-three seconds east, true bearing, three thousand seven
hundred fifteen and three tenths feet to point M in latitude twelve thousand seven hundred
twenty-nine feet north and longitude four thousand one hundred eighty-eight and fourteen one
of 5

hundredths feet west, said point M being located north seventy-six degrees, forty-two minutes,
fifty-seven seconds east, true bearing, one thousand seven hundred thirteen and forty-seven one
hundredths feet from a stone monument at the southeasterly corner of Belleville avenue and
Sawyer street in the city of New Bedford; thence south thirty-four minutes, two seconds west,
true bearing, one thousand one hundred forty-four and eighty-eight one hundredths feet to point
N in latitude eleven thousand five hundred eighty-four and seventeen one hundredths feet north
and longitude four thousand one hundred ninety-nine and forty-eight one hundredths feet west,
said point N being located south two degrees, thirty-two minutes, forty-nine seconds east, true
bearing, fifty-nine and forty-eight one hundredths feet from Mark 11 on the Coggeshall street
bridge near the city of New Bedford end; thence south twenty-seven degrees, thirteen minutes,
eight seconds west, true bearing, one thousand one hundred two and seven one hundredths feet to
point O in latitude ten thousand six hundred four and fifteen one hundredths feet north and
longitude four thousand seven hundred three and fifty-five one hundredths feet west, said point O
being located south twenty degrees, fifty-one minutes, sixteen seconds east, true bearing, two
hundred eighty-five and seven one hundredths feet from Mark 12 at the easterly end of
Washburn street in the city of New Bedford; thence south twelve degrees, sixteen minutes,
twenty-nine seconds west, true bearing, one thousand five hundred fifty-three and forty-six one
hundredths feet to point P1 in latitude nine thousand eighty-six and twenty one hundredths feet
north and longitude five thousand thirty-three and eighty-two one hundredths feet west, said
point P1 being located north eighty-three degrees, one minute, fifty-seven seconds east, true
bearing, three hundred twenty-two and ninety one hundredths feet from Mark 13 near the
southeasterly corner of Wamsutta wharf in the city of New Bedford; thence south three degrees,
forty-six minutes, fifty seconds west, true bearing, three thousand ninety-eight and seventy-six
of 5

one hundredths feet to point Q1 in latitude five thousand nine hundred ninety-four and eighteen
one hundredths feet north and longitude five thousand two hundred thirty-eight and thirteen one
hundredths feet west, said point Q1 being located north seventy-five degrees, thirty-four minutes,
twenty-six seconds east, true bearing, six hundred thirty-six and fifteen one hundredths feet from
a stone monument, at the intersection of the southerly line of Hillman street, extended easterly,
and the westerly line of North Water street extended northerly, in the city of New Bedford;
thence south three degrees, fifteen minutes, forty-four seconds east, true bearing, five hundred
forty-seven and twelve one hundredths feet to point R1 in latitude five thousand four hundred
forty-seven and ninety-five one hundredths feet north and longitude five thousand two hundred
seven feet west, said point R1 being located south eighty-two degrees, nine minutes, twenty
seconds east, true bearing, six hundred eleven and ninety-four one hundredths feet from a stone
monument at the southwest corner of North street and North Water street in the city of New
Bedford; thence south thirteen degrees, forty-five minutes, thirteen seconds east, true bearing,
four hundred forty-eight and seven one hundredths feet to point S in latitude five thousand
twelve and seventy-three one hundredths feet north and longitude five thousand one hundred and
forty-seven one hundredths feet west, said point S being located north seventy-seven degrees,
twenty-eight minutes, twenty-one seconds east, true bearing, fifteen and forty-four one
hundredths feet from Mark 14 on the southerly side of the New Bedford and Fairhaven bridge
near the city of New Bedford end; thence south nine degrees, thirty-seven minutes, fifty-six
seconds east, true bearing, three hundred fifteen and ten one hundredths feet to point T1 in
latitude four thousand seven hundred two and seven one hundredths feet north and longitude five
thousand forty-seven and seventy-five one hundredths feet west, said point T1 being located
north eighty degrees, twenty minutes, forty-six seconds east, true bearing, twenty-eight and three
of 5

one hundredths feet from Mark 15 near the southeasterly corner of Union street railway wharf in
the city of New Bedford; thence south forty-eight degrees, fifty-nine minutes, forty-one seconds
east, true bearing, nine hundred sixty-one and thirty-one one hundredths feet to point U1 in
latitude four thousand seventy-one and thirty-two one hundredths feet north and longitude four
thousand three hundred twenty-two and twenty-nine one hundredths feet west, said point U1
being located south sixty-five degrees, fifty-eight minutes, forty-four seconds east, true bearing,
ninety-four and twenty-five one hundredths feet from Mark 16 near the northwesterly corner of
the state pier in the city of New Bedford; thence south fourteen degrees, three minutes, ten
seconds east, true bearing, four thousand three hundred four and five one hundredths feet to point
V1A in latitude one hundred three and ninety-one one hundredths feet south and longitude three
thousand two hundred seventy-seven and twenty-one one hundredths feet west, said point V1A
being located south fifty-two degrees, three minutes, thirty-one seconds west, true bearing, three
thousand two hundred sixty-four and twenty-four one hundredths feet from Mark 2 on the
southwesterly corner of Atlas Tack Company's wharf in the town of Fairhaven; thence north
thirty-one degrees, fifty minutes, one second east, true bearing, two thousand one hundred
eighty-one and forty one hundredths feet to point V2 in latitude one thousand seven hundred
forty-nine and thirty-seven hundredths feet north and longitude two thousand one hundred
twenty-six and sixty-two hundreds feet west, said point V2 south eighty-three degrees, twenty-
two minutes, fifty-six seconds west, true bearing, one thousand four hundred forty-eight and
fifteen hundredths feet from said Mark 2 on the southwesterly corner of Atlas Tack Company's
wharf in the town of Fairhaven; thence south twenty-eight degrees, fourteen minutes, five
seconds east, true bearing, two thousand six hundred forty-seven and seventy-eight hundredths
feet to point V3 in latitude five hundred eighty-three and thirty-six hundredths feet south and
of 5

longitude eight hundred seventy-three and ninety-nine hundredths feet west, said point V3 being
located south four degrees, fourteen minutes, nine seconds west, true bearing, two thousand five
hundred six and fifty-four hundredths feet from said Mark 2 on the southwesterly corner of Atlas
Tack Company's wharf in the town of Fairhaven. Point V3 being the southerly end of the harbor
line is hereby established on the easterly side of New Bedford Harbor.
of 5